Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska72-1711
Tenant of business incubation center; duties; extension; when authorized.

A tenant shall:

(1) Pay rent to the community board in an amount to be determined by the community board. The community board may agree to have the rent for a predetermined number of months payable at a later date by which time the business is expected to have received committed starting capital;

(2) Pay utilities as determined by the community board; and

(3) Relocate to a permanent location not later than two years after entering a business incubation center, except that a business may request in writing extensions of this requirement for periods of not more than twelve months. The community board may grant extensions of up to twelve months at a time based upon a review of the factors in subsection (1) of section 72-1709. A tenant shall be given an opportunity to submit written information concerning those factors to the community board before the community board makes its decision approving or denying an extension.

Laws 1990, LB 409, § 11.